Hawaii statutes.
§342B-45 Citation. (a) Any person who
violates the vehicular smoke emission rules and open burning control rules
adopted by the department pursuant to this chapter may be issued a summons or
citation for such violation. Violations of vehicular smoke emission rules and
open burning control rules shall constitute a violation as defined in section
701-107 and shall be enforced by police officers. The summons or citation
shall be printed in the form hereinafter described, warning the person to
appear and answer the charge against the person at a certain place and at a
time within seven days of the issuance of the summons or citation.

(b) The summons or citation shall be designed
to provide for all necessary information. The form and content of such summons
or citation shall be adopted or prescribed by the district environmental
courts.

(c) The original of a summons or citation
shall be given to the purported violator and the other copy or copies
distributed in the manner prescribed by the district environmental courts;
provided that the district environmental courts may prescribe alternative
methods of distribution of the original and any other copies.

(d) Summonses and citations shall be
consecutively numbered and the carbon copy or copies of each shall bear the
same number.

(e) If any person fails to comply with a
summons or citation, the person who issued the summons or citation shall cause
a complaint to be entered against the person and secure the issuance of a
warrant for the person's arrest. Failure to comply with a summons or citation
is a misdemeanor. [L 1992, c 240, pt of §1; am L 1997, c 27, §1; am L
2014, c 218, §8]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next